crates/backend/tsearch/spell/fixtures/tsearch_data/spell_qsort_ties.affix
SFX A Y 1
SFX A   y   ies  .

SFX B Y 1
SFX B   0   ies  .

SFX C Y 1
SFX C   e   ies  .

SFX H Y 1
SFX H   0   es   .

SFX D Y 1
SFX D   i   ies  .

SFX E Y 1
SFX E   a   ies  .

SFX F Y 1
SFX F   o   ies  .

SFX G Y 1
SFX G   u   ies  .
